Utah statutes.
63H-1-603.   Authority to purchase agency bonds.

(1)  Any person, firm, corporation, association, political subdivision of the state, or other entity or public or private officer may purchase bonds issued by an authority under this part with funds owned or controlled by the purchaser.

(2)  Nothing in this section may be construed to relieve a purchaser of authority bonds of any duty to exercise reasonable care in selecting securities.

